Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.421

Miscellaneous state funds—Abolished.

From and after the first day of July, 1973, all funds from which moneys are transferred to the basic state general fund pursuant to subsections (1), (2), (4), and (5) of RCW 43.79.420 are abolished.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 59 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 59: See note following RCW 43.79.420.